Hawaii statutes.
§76-43 Layoff. When it is necessary to
release employees due to lack of work, lack of funds, or other legitimate
reasons, employees with permanent appointments in civil service positions shall
have layoff rights. Layoffs shall be made in accordance with procedures
negotiated under chapter 89 or established under chapter 89C, as applicable. [L
1965, c 146, §1; Supp, §3-21(x); HRS §76-43; gen ch 1985; am L 1994, c 56, §21;
am L 2000, c 253, §25]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next